New Jersey, session 222, S2208.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The owner of a multiple dwelling with nine or more dwelling units shall provide the following maintenance services in the multiple dwelling: (1)   Setting out and returning waste disposal receptacles, including storing away receptacles on days when there is no waste pickup; (2)   Providing regular daily care for all common areas, including the removal of garbage, litter, or other accumulations; (3)   Attending to sidewalks, pedestrian walkways, parking areas, and driveways, including the removal of snow and ice to permit safe passage in and out of the premises for vehicles and pedestrians; (4)   Operating the equipment designed to provide heat; and (5)   Any other routine operational and maintenance service required of the owner pursuant to the Hotel and Multiple Dwelling Law, P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-1 et seq.). b.    The maintenance services required under subsection a. of this section may be performed by: (1)   the owner if the owner resides in the multiple dwelling; (2)   maintenance staff or a maintenance service provider who resides in the multiple dwelling; or (3)   off-site maintenance staff or an off-site maintenance service provider who either: (a) is located within one block or 200 feet of the multiple dwelling, whichever is greater; or (b) provides maintenance services on a 24-hour a day basis in a manner determined by the commissioner. c.     A person designated to provide maintenance services pursuant to subsection b. of this section, if different from the owner, shall be, concurrently with and to the same extent as the owner, responsible for complying with any requirement of, or order issued pursuant to, this section, and liable for any penalty for a violation thereof. d.    (1)  The owner, or an agent thereof, shall post, in the same location and manner as a certificate of registration pursuant to subsection a. of section 12 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-12), a sign that contains the name, address, and telephone number of the person or provider, as applicable, designated to provide maintenance services pursuant to subsection b. of this section. (2)   The owner, or an agent thereof, shall post an updated sign within five days following a change in any of the information required under paragraph (1) of this subsection. e.     A municipality may adopt and enforce an ordinance imposing the requirements of this section on owners of multiple dwellings with six to eight dwelling units. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.